Vermont, session 2025-2026, H324.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 459 is amended to read:
§ 459. NORMAL AND EARLY RETIREMENT
(a) Normal retirement.
* * *
(2) Group C members. Any Group C member who is an officer or
employee of the Department of Public Safety assigned to police and law
enforcement duties, including the Commissioner of Public Safety appointed
before July 1, 2000, and who has reached his or her the member’s normal
retirement date may retire on a normal retirement allowance, on the first day of
VT LEG #380679 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.324
2025 Page 2 of 2
any month after the member may have separated from service, by filing an
application in the manner outlined in subdivision (3) of this subsection. Any
Group C member in service shall be retired on a normal retirement allowance
on the first day of the calendar month next following attainment of 57 65 years
of age. Notwithstanding, it is provided that any such member who is an
official appointed for a term of years may remain in service until the end of the
member’s term of office or any extension thereto, resulting from
reappointment.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380679 v.1